apertium-sl-es.sl.dix
	<pardef n="temn/iti__vblex">
     <e>       <p><l>iti</l>    <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p><l>it</l>     <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="supn"/></r></p></e>

     <e>       <p><l>im</l>    <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p><l>iš</l>    <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p><l>i</l>     <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p><l>iva</l>   <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
     <e> 	   <p><l>ita</l>   <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p><l>ita</l>   <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p><l>imo</l>   <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
     <e> 	   <p><l>ite</l>   <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p><l>ijo</l>   <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
     <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l>     <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

     <e>       <p><l>il</l>     <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__bil"/></e>

	 <e>       <p><l>i</l>     <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__imperative"/></e>
	
	<!-- gerund form? -->
    </pardef>

	<pardef n="zib/ati__vblex">
      	<e>       <p><l>ati</l>      <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>       <p><l>at</l>       <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="supn"/></r></p></e>

	    <e>       <p><l>am</l>       <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e r="LR"><p><l>ljem</l>     <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>       <p><l>aš</l>       <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e r="LR"><p><l>lješ</l>     <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>       <p><l>a</l>        <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e r="LR"><p><l>lje</l>      <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>       <p><l>ava</l>      <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
	    <e r="LR"><p><l>ljeva</l>    <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>	      <p><l>ata</l>      <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
	    <e r="LR"><p><l>ljeta</l>    <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>       <p><l>ata</l>      <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
	    <e r="LR"><p><l>ljeta</l>    <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>       <p><l>amo</l>      <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e r="LR"><p><l>ljemo</l>    <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e> 	  <p><l>ate</l>      <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e r="LR"><p><l>ljete</l>    <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>       <p><l>ajo</l>      <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e r="LR"><p><l>ljejo</l>    <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e>       <p><l>al</l>       <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__bil"/></e>
	    <e>       <p><l>an</l>       <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__dan"/></e>

		<e>       <p><l>aj</l>       <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__imperative"/></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>lji</l>      <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__imperative"/></e>

		<e>       <p><l>anj</l>      <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="BASE__žvižganje"/></e>
    </pardef>

	<pardef n="razde/jati__vblex">
	    <e>       <p><l>jati</l>      <r>jati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>       <p><l>jat</l>       <r>jati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="supn"/></r></p></e>

	    <e>       <p><l>jem</l>       <r>jati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e r="LR"><p><l>m</l>         <r>jati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>       <p><l>ješ</l>       <r>jati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e r="LR"><p><l>š</l>         <r>jati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>       <p><l>je</l>        <r>jati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r>jati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>       <p><l>jeva</l>      <r>jati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
	    <e r="LR"><p><l>va</l>        <r>jati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>	      <p><l>jeta</l>      <r>jati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
	    <e r="LR"><p><l>ta</l>        <r>jati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>       <p><l>jeta</l>      <r>jati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
	    <e r="LR"><p><l>ta</l>        <r>jati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>       <p><l>jemo</l>      <r>jati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e r="LR"><p><l>mo</l>        <r>jati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e> 	  <p><l>jete</l>      <r>jati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e r="LR"><p><l>te</l>        <r>jati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>       <p><l>jejo</l>      <r>jati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e r="LR"><p><l>jo</l>        <r>jati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e>       <p><l>jal</l>       <r>jati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__bil"/></e>
	    <e>       <p><l>jan</l>       <r>jati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__dan"/></e>

		<e>       <p><l>j</l>       <r>jati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__imperative"/></e>

		<e>       <p><l>janj</l>      <r>jati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="BASE__žvižganje"/></e>
    </pardef>

	<e lm="temniti">         <i>temn</i><par n="temn/iti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="razdejati">       <i>razde</i><par n="razde/jati__vblex"/></e>
